Washington statutes.
RCW 4.100.050

Appeals.

Any party is entitled to the rights of appeal afforded parties in a civil action following a decision on such motions. In the case of dismissal of a claim, review of the superior court action is de novo.

[ 2013 c 175 s 5.]